Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6820
Ramp-up period, defined.

Ramp-up period means the period of time from the date of the complete application through the end of the fourth year after the year in which the complete application was filed with the director.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 20.